Massachusetts, session 194th, H2852.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 58 and 58A of chapter 31 of the
General Laws or of any general or special law to the contrary, all positions within the
government of the Town of Bedford subject to the Civil Service Law, G.L. c. 31, shall be exempt
from any provisions therein or hereafter amended pertaining to age limits for original
appointments.
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall not impair the Civil Service status of any person employed
by the Town of Bedford on the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1